Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2297.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3303(b) of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3303. Medical Services Program.* * *(b) Fees.--(1) [The] Subject to paragraph (1.1), the department shall develop by regulation a program for inmates which includes fees for certain medical services. The regulations shall provide for consistent medical services guidelines by specifying the medical services which are subject to fees, the fee amounts, payment procedures, medical services which are not subject to fees and fees applicable to medical emergencies, chronic care and preexisting conditions.123456789101112131415161718 (1.1) The fee for nonemergency medical service provided to an inmate at the inmate's request may not exceed $1.(2) In addition to other medical services provided to the inmate, an inmate may be required to pay a fee for medical services provided because of injuries the inmate inflicted upon himself or another inmate.* * *Section 2. Within 180 days after the effective date of this section, the Department of Corrections shall amend all rules and regulations inconsistent with the amendment of 61 Pa.C.S. § 3303(b), including 37 Pa. Code § 93.12 (relating to Prison Medical Services Program).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2297PN3010 - 2 - 12345678910111213